Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1914
Truthfulness or deception; detection; license required.

No person shall, after January 1, 1981, by any means, use or attempt to use any instrument or device for the purpose of attempting to verify truthfulness or detect deception, or reporting or assisting in the reporting of a diagnostic opinion regarding such truthfulness or deception unless such person is duly licensed and holds a valid license under sections 81-1901 to 81-1936. No person shall falsely represent that he or she is employed by or represents a person licensed under sections 81-1901 to 81-1936.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 14.